Utah statutes.
78B-1-205.   Readiness of interpreter prerequisite to commencement of proceeding.

If an interpreter is required to be appointed under this part, the appointing authority may not commence proceedings until the appointed interpreter is in full view of and spatially situated to assure effective communication with the hearing-impaired participants.

